Florida, session 2026, HB179.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
14
15 Section 1. Paragraph (d) of subsection (4) of section
16 119.071, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
17 119.071 General exemptions from inspection or copying of
18 public records.—
19 (4) AGENCY PERSONNEL INFORMATION.—
20 (d)1. For purposes of this paragraph, the term:
21 a. "Appellate court clerk" means a person appointed as a
22 clerk of the Florida Supreme Court pursuant to s. 3(c), Art. V
23 of the State Constitution, a person appointed as a clerk of a
24 district court of appeal pursuant to s. 4(c), Art. V of the
25 State Constitution, or a court employee assigned to the 2610 or
Page 1 of 21
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb179-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 179 2026
26 2620 class code.
27 b.a. "Home addresses" means the dwelling location at which
28 an individual resides and includes the physical address, mailing
29 address, street address, parcel identification number, plot
30 identification number, legal property description, neighborhood
31 name and lot number, GPS coordinates, and any other descriptive
32 property information that may reveal the home address.
33 c.b. "Judicial assistant" means a court employee assigned
34 to the following class codes: 8140, 8150, 8310, and 8320.
35 d.c. "Telephone numbers" includes home telephone numbers,
36 personal cellular telephone numbers, personal pager telephone
37 numbers, and telephone numbers associated with personal
38 communications devices.
39 2.a. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of
40 birth, and photographs of active or former sworn law enforcement
41 personnel or of active or former civilian personnel employed by
42 a law enforcement agency, including correctional and
43 correctional probation officers, personnel of the Department of
44 Children and Families whose duties include the investigation of
45 abuse, neglect, exploitation, fraud, theft, or other criminal
46 activities, personnel of the Department of Health whose duties
47 are to support the investigation of child abuse or neglect, and
48 personnel of the Department of Revenue or local governments
49 whose responsibilities include revenue collection and
50 enforcement or child support enforcement; the names, home
Page 2 of 21
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb179-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 179 2026
51 addresses, telephone numbers, photographs, dates of birth, and
52 places of employment of the spouses and children of such
53 personnel; and the names and locations of schools and day care
54 facilities attended by the children of such personnel are exempt
55 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State
56 Constitution.
57 b. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
58 and photographs of current or former nonsworn investigative
59 personnel of the Department of Financial Services whose duties
60 include the investigation of fraud, theft, workers' compensation
61 coverage requirements and compliance, other related criminal
62 activities, or state regulatory requirement violations; the
63 names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and
64 places of employment of the spouses and children of such
65 personnel; and the names and locations of schools and day care
66 facilities attended by the children of such personnel are exempt
67 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State
68 Constitution.
69 c. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
70 and photographs of current or former nonsworn investigative
71 personnel of the Office of Financial Regulation's Bureau of
72 Financial Investigations whose duties include the investigation
73 of fraud, theft, other related criminal activities, or state
74 regulatory requirement violations; the names, home addresses,
75 telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of
Page 3 of 21
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb179-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 179 2026
76 the spouses and children of such personnel; and the names and
77 locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the
78 children of such personnel are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s.
79 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution.
80 d. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
81 and photographs of current or former firefighters certified in
82 compliance with s. 633.408; the names, home addresses, telephone
83 numbers, photographs, dates of birth, and places of employment
84 of the spouses and children of such firefighters; and the names
85 and locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the
86 children of such firefighters are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and
87 s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution.
88 e. The home addresses, dates of birth, and telephone
89 numbers of current or former justices of the Supreme Court,
90 district court of appeal judges, circuit court judges, and
91 county court judges and current judicial assistants and
92 appellate court clerks; the names, home addresses, telephone
93 numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of the spouses
94 and children of current or former justices and judges and
95 current judicial assistants and appellate court clerks; and the
96 names and locations of schools and day care facilities attended
97 by the children of current or former justices and judges and of
98 current judicial assistants and appellate court clerks are
99 exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State
100 Constitution. This sub-subparagraph is subject to the Open
Page 4 of 21
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb179-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 179 2026
101 Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and
102 shall stand repealed on October 2, 2031 2028, unless reviewed
103 and saved from repeal through reenactment by the Legislature.
104 f. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
105 and photographs of current or former state attorneys, assistant
106 state attorneys, statewide prosecutors, or assistant statewide
107 prosecutors; the names, home addresses, telephone numbers,
108 photographs, dates of birth, and places of employment of the
109 spouses and children of current or former state attorneys,
110 assistant state attorneys, statewide prosecutors, or assistant
111 statewide prosecutors; and the names and locations of schools
112 and day care facilities attended by the children of current or
113 former state attorneys, assistant state attorneys, statewide
114 prosecutors, or assistant statewide prosecutors are exempt from
115 s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution.
116 g. The home addresses, dates of birth, and telephone
117 numbers of general magistrates, special magistrates, judges of
118 compensation claims, administrative law judges of the Division
119 of Administrative Hearings, and child support enforcement
120 hearing officers; the names, home addresses, telephone numbers,
121 dates of birth, and places of employment of the spouses and
122 children of general magistrates, special magistrates, judges of
123 compensation claims, administrative law judges of the Division
124 of Administrative Hearings, and child support enforcement
125 hearing officers; and the names and locations of schools and day
Page 5 of 21
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb179-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 179 2026
126 care facilities attended by the children of general magistrates,
127 special magistrates, judges of compensation claims,
128 administrative law judges of the Division of Administrative
129 Hearings, and child support enforcement hearing officers are
130 exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State
131 Constitution.
132 h. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
133 and photographs of current or former human resource, labor
134 relations, or employee relations directors, assistant directors,
135 managers, or assistant managers of any local government agency
136 or water management district whose duties include hiring and
137 firing employees, labor contract negotiation, administration, or
138 other personnel-related duties; the names, home addresses,
139 telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of
140 the spouses and children of such personnel; and the names and
141 locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the
142 children of such personnel are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s.
143 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution.
144 i. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
145 and photographs of current or former code enforcement officers;
146 the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
147 and places of employment of the spouses and children of such
148 personnel; and the names and locations of schools and day care
149 facilities attended by the children of such personnel are exempt
150 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State
Page 6 of 21
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb179-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 179 2026
151 Constitution.
152 j. The home addresses, telephone numbers, places of
153 employment, dates of birth, and photographs of current or former
154 guardians ad litem, as defined in s. 39.01; the names, home
155 addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of
156 employment of the spouses and children of such persons; and the
157 names and locations of schools and day care facilities attended
158 by the children of such persons are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and
159 s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution.
160 k. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
161 and photographs of current or former juvenile probation
162 officers, juvenile probation supervisors, detention
163 superintendents, assistant detention superintendents, juvenile
164 justice detention officers I and II, juvenile justice detention
165 officer supervisors, juvenile justice residential officers,
166 juvenile justice residential officer supervisors I and II,
167 juvenile justice counselors, juvenile justice counselor
168 supervisors, human services counselor administrators, senior
169 human services counselor administrators, rehabilitation
170 therapists, and social services counselors of the Department of
171 Juvenile Justice; the names, home addresses, telephone numbers,
172 dates of birth, and places of employment of spouses and children
173 of such personnel; and the names and locations of schools and
174 day care facilities attended by the children of such personnel
175 are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State
Page 7 of 21
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb179-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 179 2026
176 Constitution.
177 l. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
178 and photographs of current or former public defenders, assistant
179 public defenders, criminal conflict and civil regional counsel,
180 and assistant criminal conflict and civil regional counsel; the
181 names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and
182 places of employment of the spouses and children of current or
183 former public defenders, assistant public defenders, criminal
184 conflict and civil regional counsel, and assistant criminal
185 conflict and civil regional counsel; and the names and locations
186 of schools and day care facilities attended by the children of
187 current or former public defenders, assistant public defenders,
188 criminal conflict and civil regional counsel, and assistant
189 criminal conflict and civil regional counsel are exempt from s.
190 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution.
191 m. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
192 and photographs of current or former investigators or inspectors
193 of the Department of Business and Professional Regulation; the
194 names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and
195 places of employment of the spouses and children of such current
196 or former investigators and inspectors; and the names and
197 locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the
198 children of such current or former investigators and inspectors
199 are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State
200 Constitution.
Page 8 of 21
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb179-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 179 2026
201 n. The home addresses, telephone numbers, and dates of
202 birth of county tax collectors; the names, home addresses,
203 telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of
204 the spouses and children of such tax collectors; and the names
205 and locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the
206 children of such tax collectors are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and
207 s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution.
208 o. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
209 and photographs of current or former personnel of the Department
210 of Health whose duties include, or result in, the determination
211 or adjudication of eligibility for social security disability
212 benefits, the investigation or prosecution of complaints filed
213 against health care practitioners, or the inspection of health
214 care practitioners or health care facilities licensed by the
215 Department of Health; the names, home addresses, telephone
216 numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of the spouses
217 and children of such personnel; and the names and locations of
218 schools and day care facilities attended by the children of such
219 personnel are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of
220 the State Constitution.
221 p. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
222 and photographs of current or former impaired practitioner
223 consultants who are retained by an agency or current or former
224 employees of an impaired practitioner consultant whose duties
225 result in a determination of a person's skill and safety to
Page 9 of 21
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb179-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 179 2026
226 practice a licensed profession; the names, home addresses,
227 telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of
228 the spouses and children of such consultants or their employees;
229 and the names and locations of schools and day care facilities
230 attended by the children of such consultants or employees are
231 exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State
232 Constitution.
233 q. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
234 and photographs of current or former emergency medical
235 technicians or paramedics certified under chapter 401; the
236 names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and
237 places of employment of the spouses and children of such
238 emergency medical technicians or paramedics; and the names and
239 locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the
240 children of such emergency medical technicians or paramedics are
241 exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State
242 Constitution.
243 r. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
244 and photographs of current or former personnel employed in an
245 agency's office of inspector general or internal audit
246 department whose duties include auditing or investigating waste,
247 fraud, abuse, theft, exploitation, or other activities that
248 could lead to criminal prosecution or administrative discipline;
249 the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
250 and places of employment of spouses and children of such
Page 10 of 21
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb179-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 179 2026
251 personnel; and the names and locations of schools and day care
252 facilities attended by the children of such personnel are exempt
253 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State
254 Constitution.
255 s. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
256 and photographs of current or former directors, managers,
257 supervisors, nurses, and clinical employees of an addiction
258 treatment facility; the home addresses, telephone numbers,
259 photographs, dates of birth, and places of employment of the
260 spouses and children of such personnel; and the names and
261 locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the
262 children of such personnel are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s.
263 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. For purposes of this
264 sub-subparagraph, the term "addiction treatment facility" means
265 a county government, or agency thereof, that is licensed
266 pursuant to s. 397.401 and provides substance abuse prevention,
267 intervention, or clinical treatment, including any licensed
268 service component described in s. 397.311(27).
269 t. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
270 and photographs of current or former directors, managers,
271 supervisors, and clinical employees of a child advocacy center
272 that meets the standards of s. 39.3035(2) and fulfills the
273 screening requirement of s. 39.3035(3), and the members of a
274 Child Protection Team as described in s. 39.303 whose duties
275 include supporting the investigation of child abuse or sexual
Page 11 of 21
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb179-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 179 2026
276 abuse, child abandonment, child neglect, and child exploitation
277 or to provide services as part of a multidisciplinary case
278 review team; the names, home addresses, telephone numbers,
279 photographs, dates of birth, and places of employment of the
280 spouses and children of such personnel and members; and the
281 names and locations of schools and day care facilities attended
282 by the children of such personnel and members are exempt from s.
283 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution.
284 u. The home addresses, telephone numbers, places of
285 employment, dates of birth, and photographs of current or former
286 staff and domestic violence advocates, as defined in s.
287 90.5036(1)(b), of domestic violence centers certified by the
288 Department of Children and Families under chapter 39; the names,
289 home addresses, telephone numbers, places of employment, dates
290 of birth, and photographs of the spouses and children of such
291 personnel; and the names and locations of schools and day care
292 facilities attended by the children of such personnel are exempt
293 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State
294 Constitution.
295 v. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
296 and photographs of current or former inspectors or investigators
297 of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services; the
298 names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and
299 places of employment of the spouses and children of current or
300 former inspectors or investigators; and the names and locations
Page 12 of 21
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb179-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 179 2026
301 of schools and day care facilities attended by the children of
302 current or former inspectors or investigators are exempt from s.
303 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. This
304 sub-subparagraph is subject to the Open Government Sunset Review
305 Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed on
306 October 2, 2028, unless reviewed and saved from repeal through
307 reenactment by the Legislature.
308 w. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
309 and photographs of current county attorneys, assistant county
310 attorneys, deputy county attorneys, city attorneys, assistant
311 city attorneys, and deputy city attorneys; the names, home
312 addresses, telephone numbers, photographs, dates of birth, and
313 places of employment of the spouses and children of current
314 county attorneys, assistant county attorneys, deputy county
315 attorneys, city attorneys, assistant city attorneys, and deputy
316 city attorneys; and the names and locations of schools and day
317 care facilities attended by the children of current county
318 attorneys, assistant county attorneys, deputy county attorneys,
319 city attorneys, assistant city attorneys, and deputy city
320 attorneys are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of
321 the State Constitution. This exemption does not apply to a
322 county attorney, assistant county attorney, deputy county
323 attorney, city attorney, assistant city attorney, or deputy city
324 attorney who qualifies as a candidate for election to public
325 office. This sub-subparagraph is subject to the Open Government
Page 13 of 21
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb179-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 179 2026
326 Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand
327 repealed on October 2, 2029, unless reviewed and saved from
328 repeal through reenactment by the Legislature.
329 x. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
330 and photographs of current or former commissioners of the
331 Florida Gaming Control Commission; the names, home addresses,
332 telephone numbers, dates of birth, photographs, and places of
333 employment of the spouses and children of such current or former
334 commissioners; and the names and locations of schools and day
335 care facilities attended by the children of such current or
336 former commissioners are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a),
337 Art. I of the State Constitution. This sub-subparagraph is
338 subject to the Open Government Sunset Review Act in accordance
339 with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed on October 2, 2029,
340 unless reviewed and saved from repeal through reenactment by the
341 Legislature.
342 y. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
343 and photographs of current clerks of the circuit court, deputy
344 clerks of the circuit court, and clerk of the circuit court
345 personnel; the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates
346 of birth, and places of employment of the spouses and children
347 of current clerks of the circuit court, deputy clerks of the
348 circuit court, and clerk of the circuit court personnel; and the
349 names and locations of schools and day care facilities attended
350 by the children of current clerks of the circuit court, deputy
Page 14 of 21
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb179-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 179 2026
351 clerks of the circuit court, and clerk of the circuit court
352 personnel are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of
353 the State Constitution. This sub-subparagraph is subject to the
354 Open Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15
355 and shall stand repealed on October 2, 2029, unless reviewed and
356 saved from repeal through reenactment by the Legislature.
357 z.(I) As used in this sub-subparagraph, the term:
358 (A) "Congressional member" means a person who is elected
359 to serve as a member of the United States House of
360 Representatives or is elected or appointed to serve as a member
361 of the United States Senate.
362 (B) "Partial home address" means the dwelling location at
363 which an individual resides and includes the physical address,
364 mailing address, street address, parcel identification number,
365 plot identification number, legal property description,
366 neighborhood name and lot number, GPS coordinates, and any other
367 descriptive property information that may reveal the partial
368 home address, except for the city and zip code.
369 (C) "Public officer" means a person who holds one of the
370 following offices: Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Chief
371 Financial Officer, Attorney General, Agriculture Commissioner,
372 state representative, state senator, property appraiser,
373 supervisor of elections, school superintendent, school board
374 member, mayor, city commissioner, or county commissioner.
375 (II) The following information is exempt from s. 119.07(1)
Page 15 of 21
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb179-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 179 2026
376 and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution:
377 (A) The partial home addresses of a current congressional
378 member or public officer and his or her spouse or adult child.
379 (B) The telephone numbers of a current congressional
380 member or public officer and his or her spouse or adult child.
381 (C) The name, home addresses, telephone numbers, and date
382 of birth of a minor child of a current congressional member or
383 public officer and the name and location of the school or day
384 care facility attended by the minor child.
385 (III) This sub-subparagraph is subject to the Open
386 Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and
387 shall stand repealed on October 2, 2030, unless reviewed and
388 saved from repeal through reenactment by the Legislature.
389 3.a. An agency that is the custodian of the information
390 specified in subparagraph 2. and that is not the employer of the
391 officer, employee, justice, judge, or other person specified in
392 subparagraph 2. must maintain the exempt status of that
393 information only if the officer, employee, justice, judge, other
394 person, or employing agency of the designated employee submits a
395 written and notarized request for maintenance of the exemption
396 to the custodial agency. The request must state under oath the
397 statutory basis for the individual's exemption request and
398 confirm the individual's status as a party eligible for exempt
399 status.
400 b. An agency that is the custodian of information
Page 16 of 21
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb179-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 179 2026
401 specified in sub-subparagraph 2.z. and that is not the employer
402 of the congressional member, public officer, or other person
403 specified in sub-subparagraph 2.z. must maintain the exempt
404 status of that information only if an individual requests the
405 maintenance of an exemption pursuant to sub-subparagraph 2.z. on
406 the basis of eligibility as a current congressional member or
407 public officer and his or her spouse or child submits, as part
408 of the written and notarized request required by sub-
409 subparagraph a., the date of the congressional member's or
410 public officer's election or appointment to public office, the
411 date on which that office is next subject to election, and, if
412 applicable, the date on which the current congressional member's
413 or public officer's minor child reaches the age of majority. The
414 custodian must maintain an exemption granted pursuant to sub-
415 subparagraph 2.z. until the qualifying conditions for the
416 exemption no longer apply to the person subject to the
417 exemption.
418 4.a. A county property appraiser, as defined in s.
419 192.001(3), or a county tax collector, as defined in s.
420 192.001(4), who receives a written and notarized request for
421 maintenance of the exemption pursuant to subparagraph 3. must
422 comply by removing the name of the individual with exempt status
423 and the instrument number or Official Records book and page
424 number identifying the property with the exempt status from all
425 publicly available records maintained by the property appraiser
Page 17 of 21
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb179-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 179 2026
426 or tax collector. For written requests received on or before
427 July 1, 2021, a county property appraiser or county tax
428 collector must comply with this sub-subparagraph by October 1,
429 2021. A county property appraiser or county tax collector may
430 not remove the street address, legal description, or other
431 information identifying real property within the agency's
432 records so long as a name or personal information otherwise
433 exempt from inspection and copying pursuant to this section is
434 not associated with the property or otherwise displayed in the
435 public records of the agency.
436 b. Any information restricted from public display,
437 inspection, or copying under sub-subparagraph a. must be
438 provided to the individual whose information was removed.
439 5. An officer, an employee, a justice, a judge, or other
440 person specified in subparagraph 2. may submit a written request
441 for the release of his or her exempt information to the
442 custodial agency. The written request must be notarized and must
443 specify the information to be released and the party authorized
444 to receive the information. Upon receipt of the written request,
445 the custodial agency must release the specified information to
446 the party authorized to receive such information.
447 6. The exemptions in this paragraph apply to information
448 held by an agency before, on, or after the effective date of the
449 exemption.
450 7. Information made exempt under this paragraph may be
Page 18 of 21
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb179-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 179 2026
451 disclosed pursuant to s. 28.2221 to a title insurer authorized
452 pursuant to s. 624.401 and its affiliates as defined in s.
453 624.10; a title insurance agent or title insurance agency as
454 defined in s. 626.841(1) or (2), respectively; or an attorney
455 duly admitted to practice law in this state and in good standing
456 with The Florida Bar.
457 8. The exempt status of a home address contained in the
458 Official Records is maintained only during the period when a
459 protected party resides at the dwelling location. Upon
460 conveyance of real property after October 1, 2021, and when such
461 real property no longer constitutes a protected party's home
462 address as defined in sub-subparagraph 1.b. 1.a., the protected
463 party must submit a written request to release the removed
464 information to the county recorder. The written request to
465 release the removed information must be notarized, must confirm
466 that a protected party's request for release is pursuant to a
467 conveyance of his or her dwelling location, and must specify the
468 Official Records book and page, instrument number, or clerk's
469 file number for each document containing the information to be
470 released.
471 9. Upon the death of a protected party as verified by a
472 certified copy of a death certificate or court order, any party
473 can request the county recorder to release a protected
474 decedent's removed information unless there is a related request
475 on file with the county recorder for continued removal of the
Page 19 of 21
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb179-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 179 2026
476 decedent's information or unless such removal is otherwise
477 prohibited by statute or by court order. The written request to
478 release the removed information upon the death of a protected
479 party must attach the certified copy of a death certificate or
480 court order and must be notarized, must confirm the request for
481 release is due to the death of a protected party, and must
482 specify the Official Records book and page number, instrument
483 number, or clerk's file number for each document containing the
484 information to be released. A fee may not be charged for the
485 release of any document pursuant to such request.
486 Section 2. Paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of section
487 744.21031, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
488 744.21031 Public records exemption.—
489 (1) For purposes of this section, the term:
490 (c) "Telephone numbers" has the same meaning as provided
491 in s. 119.071(4)(d)1.d. s. 119.071(4)(d)1.c.
492 Section 3. The Legislature finds that it is a public
493 necessity that the home addresses, dates of birth, and telephone
494 numbers of current appellate court clerks; the names, home
495 addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of
496 employment of the spouses and children of current appellate
497 court clerks; and the names and locations of schools and day
498 care facilities attended by children of current appellate court
499 clerks be made exempt from s. 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and
500 s. 24(a), Article I of the State Constitution. While performing
Page 20 of 21
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb179-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 179 2026
501 their duties to issue court orders, maintain case dockets,
502 answer telephone calls, respond to correspondence, and interact
503 with visitors to the courthouse, appellate court clerks may
504 incur the ill will of litigants and their associates and
505 families. As a result, current appellate court clerks and their
506 spouses and children may be targets for acts of revenge. If such
507 identifying and location information is released, the safety of
508 current appellate court clerks and their spouses and children
509 could be seriously jeopardized. For this reason, the Legislature
510 finds that it is a public necessity that such information be
511 made exempt from public records requirements.
512 Section 4. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 21 of 21
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb179-00